Washington statutes.
RCW 36.16.060

Place of filing oaths and bonds.

Every county officer, before entering upon the duties of his or her office, shall file his or her oath of office in the office of the county auditor and his or her official bond in the office of the county clerk: PROVIDED, That the official bond of the county clerk, after first being recorded by the county auditor, shall be filed in the office of the county treasurer.

Oaths and bonds of deputies shall be filed in the offices in which the oaths and bonds of their principals are required to be filed.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4008; 1963 c 4 s 36.16.060. Prior: 1955 c 157 s 8; prior: (i) 1895 c 53 s 2, part; RRS s 71, part. (ii) 1890 p 35 s 5, part; RRS s 9934, part.]